Washington statutes.
RCW 43.330.403

Reporting availability of high-speed internet—Survey of high-speed internet infrastructure owned or leased by state agencies—Geographic information system map—Rules.

(1) Subject to the availability of federal or state funding, the department may:

(a) Develop an interactive website to allow residents to self-report whether high-speed internet is available at their home or residence and at what speed; and

(b) Conduct a detailed survey of all high-speed internet infrastructure owned or leased by state agencies and create a geographic information system map of all high-speed internet infrastructure owned or leased by the state.

(2) State agencies responding to a survey request from the department under subsection (1)(b) of this section shall respond in a reasonable and timely manner, not to exceed one hundred twenty days. The department shall request of state agencies, at a minimum:

(a) The total bandwidth of high-speed internet infrastructure owned or leased;

(b) The cost of maintaining that high-speed internet infrastructure, if owned, or the price paid for the high-speed internet infrastructure, if leased; and

(c) The leasing entity, if applicable.

(3) The department may adopt rules as necessary to carry out the provisions of this section.

(4) For purposes of this section, "state agency" includes every state office, department, division, bureau, board, commission, or other state agency.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 604; 2009 c 509 s 3. Formerly RCW 43.105.372.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.

Findings—Intent—Purpose—Effective date—2009 c 509: See notes following RCW 43.330.400.